Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-121
School District Reimbursement Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the School District Reimbursement Fund for use by the Department of Health and Human Services. The fund shall consist of money received from school districts or the department pursuant to section 79-1152 for the operation of special education programs within the department. The fund shall be used for the operation of such programs pursuant to sections 79-1152, 79-1153, and 79-1155 to 79-1158.

Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 139;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1066;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 907;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 783.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.